Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201583-931
Assistant director of the Division of Community-Centered Services; qualifications.

The Director of Correctional Services shall appoint as assistant director of the Division of Community-Centered Services any person who has an appropriate academic background and adequate training and experience.

Laws 1975, LB 417, § 9;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 77;

Laws 2015, LB598, § 36.
August 30, 2015